Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2097.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 72 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding parts to read:PART IPRELIMINARY PROVISIONS(Reserved)PART IITAXATIONChapter17. (Reserved)CHAPTER 17(Reserved)Section 2. Title 72 is amended by adding a part heading 1234567891011121314151617181920 immediately preceding Chapter 31 to read:PART IIIFISCAL AFFAIRSSection 3. Title 72 is amended by adding a chapter to read:CHAPTER 100CAPITAL PROJECTSSubchapterA. General ProvisionsB. Capital Improvement PlansSUBCHAPTER AGENERAL PROVISIONSSec.10001. Definitions.§ 10001. Definitions. The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Capital project." Any of the following:(1) A project which is financed or funded or is proposed to be financed or funded by the issuance of bonds, notes or other evidences of indebtedness of the Commonwealth or a State agency.(2) A project which is financed or funded or is proposed to be financed or funded by an appropriation in the General Appropriation Act and designated as a capital expenditure by the laws of this Commonwealth or under standards prescribed by the State Treasurer."Legislative action." Any of the following:(1) A vote by a standing committee of the Senate to report a capital budget bill out of the standing committee of 20250HB2097PN2693 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the Senate.(2) A vote of a standing committee of the House of Representatives to report a capital budget bill out of the standing committee of the House of Representatives."Plan." The Commonwealth capital improvement plan prepared under section 10002 (relating to Commonwealth capital improvement plans)."State agency." An executive or administrative department, office, public authority or other instrumentality of the Commonwealth. The term includes a board, commission or agency of the Commonwealth that is authorized to incur debt or issue bonds under the seal of the board, commission or agency.SUBCHAPTER BCAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PLANSSec.10002. Commonwealth capital improvement plans.10003. Duties of State agencies.10004. Debt limit for capital projects.10005. Prohibition on exceeding debt limit for capital projects.10006. Legislative oversight.§ 10002. Commonwealth capital improvement plans. (a) Duties of Governor.--(1) The Governor shall annually prepare a Commonwealth capital improvement plan containing the Governor's proposals for expenditures on capital projects. No later than February 1 of each year, the Office of the Budget shall post the plan on the Office of the Budget's publicly accessible Internet website for review and comment by the public.(2) No later than February 1 of each year, the Governor 20250HB2097PN2693 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 shall submit a copy of the plan to the State Treasurer, Auditor General, Independent Fiscal Office and members of the General Assembly.(b) Contents of plan.--The plan shall include all of the following:(1) A detailed list of capital projects that the Governor recommends to be commenced, continued or completed by each State agency within the next three fiscal years.(2) The fiscal impact of the capital projects recommended under paragraph (1) on future operating expenses of the Commonwealth, including the Governor's recommendations on methods to fund the capital projects, and the prioritization of the capital projects.(3) A schedule for the next fiscal year of the Governor's recommendations for the appropriation of funds from the issuance of bonds authorized under the laws of this Commonwealth.(4) A review of capital projects that have recently been commenced, continued or completed or are in the process of being commenced, continued or completed.(5) The Governor's recommendations on the maintenance of each State agency's physical properties and equipment of State agencies.(6) The Governor's recommendations on the use of properties specified under section 10003(7) (relating to duties of State agencies).(7) A report on the cost of the Commonwealth's overall debt for the previous fiscal year and the current fiscal year and the estimated cost for the next five fiscal years, including all of the following:20250HB2097PN2693 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (i) The outstanding general obligation debt and debt service costs.(ii) The costs of leases and installment obligations for capital projects.(iii) The costs of long-term liabilities as recorded in a schedule of long-term debt changes, including bonded and nonbonded debt changes, in the Commonwealth's annual comprehensive financial report under section 701 of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.177, No.175), known as The Administrative Code of 1929.(iv) The unfunded actuarial accrued liability for the Commonwealth's retirement systems and postretirement medical and other benefits.(8) An assessment of the Commonwealth's ability to increase the Commonwealth's overall debt and the Governor's recommendation on the amount of the increase in the Commonwealth's overall debt. In developing the assessment and recommendation under this paragraph, the Governor shall consider the criteria used by municipal securities rating services in rating the Commonwealth's debt obligations and any other information that the Governor deems relevant to the assessment and recommendation.(9) The certified debt limit for capital projects under section 10004 (relating to debt limit for capital projects).§ 10003. Duties of State agencies. No later than October 15 of each year, a State agency shall provide the Governor and the members of the General Assembly with all of the following:(1) A detailed list of capital projects that the State agency seeks to commence, continue or complete for the State 20250HB2097PN2693 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 agency's purposes in the next three fiscal years.(2) The impact of the capital projects under paragraph (1) on future operating expenses of the State agency and relevant supporting data.(3) Economic forecasts of the State agency's capital projects that will be commenced, continued or completed in the four fiscal years after the capital projects under paragraph (1) are completed as may be necessary for all of the following:(i) The adequate presentation of the State agency's capital projects.(ii) Compiling a schedule for the planning, implementation or construction of the State agency's capital projects.(4) A schedule for the next fiscal year of the State agency's requested appropriations of funds from the issuance of bonds authorized under the laws of this Commonwealth.(5) A report with information on the State agency's capital projects that have been recently commenced, continued or completed or are in the process of being commenced, continued or completed.(6) A report with information on the maintenance of the State agency's physical properties and capital equipment.(7) The status of real property owned or leased by the State agency and the current or future availability of the real property for other uses by the Commonwealth.(8) Any other information requested by the Governor or a member of the General Assembly regarding the State agency's capital projects.§ 10004. Debt limit for capital projects. 20250HB2097PN2693 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (a) Certification.--No later than December 1 of each year, the Auditor General shall certify the debt limit for capital projects funded by the issuance of bonds for the previous fiscal year to ensure that the cost does not cause the amount of all of the Commonwealth's net debt outstanding to exceed one and three-quarters times the average of the annual tax revenues deposited in the previous five fiscal years in accordance with section 7 of Article VIII of the Constitution of Pennsylvania. The Auditor General shall provide the certification to the Governor, State Treasurer and Independent Fiscal Office and post the certification on the Department of the Auditor General's publicly accessible Internet website.(b) Quarterly analysis.--The Auditor General shall provide a quarterly analysis of the debt limit for capital projects under subsection (a) to the Governor, State Treasurer and Independent Fiscal Office and post the quarterly analysis on the Department of the Auditor General's publicly accessible Internet website.§ 10005. Prohibition on exceeding debt limit for capital projects.In order to enforce the provisions of section 7 of Article VIII of the Constitution of Pennsylvania, all of the following apply:(1) The General Assembly shall not pass a capital budget bill with expenditures that exceed the debt limit certified by the Auditor General under section 10004 (relating to debt limit for capital projects).(2) The Governor shall not approve a capital budget bill with expenditures that exceed the debt limit certified by the Auditor General under section 10004. (3) The State Treasurer shall not pay for expenditures 20250HB2097PN2693 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 in a capital budget bill with expenditures that exceed the debt limit certified by the Auditor General under section 10004.§ 10006. Legislative oversight.(a) Hearings.--The Appropriations Committee of the Senate and the Appropriations Committee of the House of Representatives shall hold no fewer than three hearings on the plan before taking legislative action on a capital budget bill.(b) Fiscal notes.--A copy of the certification under section 10004(a) (relating to debt limit for capital projects) shall be attached as part of the fiscal note for a capital budget bill.Section 4. This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB2097PN2693 - 8 - 123456789101112